Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0053.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15b. The portion of highway US-8 from the Michigan border with Wisconsin and extending north to the intersection with highway US-2 in the city of Norway shall be known as the "Medio J. Bacco Memorial Highway". Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.